test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-suaja_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - suájá: # á-stems
    suájá+N+Sg+Nom: suáj̣á    
    suájá+N+Sg+Gen: suájá
    suájá+N+Sg+Ill: suáj̣án
    suájá+N+Sg+Loc: suáˊjáást
    suájá+N+Sg+Com: suáˊjáin
    suájá+N+Sg+Abe: suáˊjáttáá
    suájá+N+Ess: suáiján
    suájá+N+Par: suáijád
    suájá+N+Pl+Nom: suáˊjáh
    suájá+N+Pl+Gen: suáˊjái
    suájá+N+Pl+Acc: suáˊjáid
    suájá+N+Pl+Ill: suáˊjáid
    suájá+N+Pl+Loc: suáˊjáin
    suájá+N+Pl+Com: suáˊjáiguin
    suájá+N+Pl+Abe: suáˊjáittáá
